Utah statutes.
48-2c-103.   Application of partnership provisions.
"Partnership" and "limited partnership," when used in any chapter or title
other than this chapter or Title 48, Chapter 1, General and Limited Liability
Partnership, and Title 48, Chapter 2a, Utah Revised Uniform Limited
Partnership Act, are considered to include a company organized under this
chapter, unless the context requires otherwise.
